Missouri, session 2026, HB2812.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 578, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 578.019, to read as follows:
578.019. 1. A person commits the offense of unlawful dog tethering or chaining
if the person:
(1) Keeps a dog tethered or chained while the dog is unsupervised by a
competent individual physically present on the property with the dog;
(2) Keeps a dog tethered, chained, or otherwise restricted by a leash, rope, chain,
or other similar mechanism with which the dog does not have shelter from extreme
natural elements, adequate food, or access to unfrozen potable water;
(3) Keeps a dog tethered or chained in an area that is unsafe or insanitary or not
free from obstruction that may cause entanglement or injury;
(4) Keeps a dog tethered or chained for at least thirty minutes at a time, over a
total of three hours in a twenty-four-hour period; or
(5) Inappropriately tethers or chains a dog with a tether or chain that is not
proportionate to the size of the dog, that is less than fifteen feet in length, and that is not
attached to the dog by a properly fitting harness or collar.
2. The offense of unlawful dog tethering or chaining is a class B misdemeanor.
3. The provisions of this section shall not apply to a person restraining a dog:
(1) Under the requirements of a camping or recreational area; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2812 2
(2) Temporarily during the act of hunting.
4. As used in this section, the following terms mean:
(1) "Animal control", the municipal or county animal control agency or other
entity responsible for enforcing animal-related laws;
(2) "Tethering or chaining", the practice of tying, fastening, or restraining a dog
to a stationary object as a means of keeping the dog under control. The term "tethering
or chaining" does not apply to a dog being walked on a leash.
5. A law enforcement or an animal control officer, if the animal control officer
has the authority, may make an arrest for a violation under this section.
6. An animal control officer may immediately seize a dog if the officer has
reasonable grounds to believe that prompt action is required to protect the health and
safety of the dog or others.
✔